pl: Styl dzianiny: Aran; Splot koszykowy; Splot warkoczowy; Fair Isle; Splot rybacki; Intarsja; Pointelle; Splot prążkowany; Ścieg perłowy; Splot waflowy; Inny
da: Strikstil: Aran; Kurveflet; Kabelstrik; Fair Isle; Fiskerstrik; Intarsia; Pointelle; Ribstrik; Perlestrik; Vaffelstrik; Andet
th: สไตล์ถัก: ลายอรัน; ลายขัดสาน; ลายเปีย; แฟร์ไอล์; ถักลายฟิชเชอร์แมน; อินทาร์เซีย; พอยเทล; ลายลอน; ลายซี้ดสติช; ลายวาฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
sv: Stickstil: Aran; Korgmönster; Flätstickad; Fair Isle; Fiskarstickad; Intarsia; Pointelle; Ribbstickad; Mosstickad; Våffelstickad; Övrigt
el: Στυλ πλεξίματος: Aran; Πλέξη καλαθιού; Πλεξούδα; Fair Isle; Πλέξη fisherman; Ιντάρσια; Pointelle; Πλέξη ριπ; Πλέξη σπόρου; Πλέξη βάφλα; Άλλο
hu: Kötési minta: Aran; Kosárfonat; Csavart kötés; Fair Isle; Halászkötés; Intarzia; Pointelle (áttört); Bordás kötés; Rizskötés; Rácsos (gofri) kötés; Egyéb
zh-CN: 针织风格: 阿兰针织; 席纹编织; 绞花针织; 费尔岛提花; 渔夫针织; 嵌花; 镂空; 罗纹针织; 桂花针; 华夫格针织; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на плетивото: Аран; Плетка кошница; Плетка с плитки; Fair Isle; Рибарска плетка; Интарзия; Поантел; Рипсена плетка; Оризова плетка; Вафлена плетка; Друго
it: Stile della maglia: Aran; Motivo a cesto; Maglia a trecce; Fair Isle; Maglia stile pescatore; Intarsio; Pointelle; Maglia a coste; Punto grana di riso; Maglia a nido d'ape; Altro
ja: ニットスタイル: アラン; バスケットウィーブ; ケーブルニット; フェアアイル; フィッシャーマンニット; インターシャ; ポインテール; リブニット; シードステッチ; ワッフルニット; その他
fr: Type de tricot: Aran; Natté; Tricot torsadé; Jacquard Fair Isle; Tricot de pêcheur; Intarsia; Pointelle; Tricot côtelé; Point de riz; Tricot gaufré; Autre
ro-RO: Stil tricot: Aran; Împletitură tip coș; Tricotaj cu torsade; Fair Isle; Tricot pescăresc; Intarsia; Pointelle; Tricot striat; Punct de orez; Tricot tip waffle; Altele
zh-TW: 針織樣式: 阿蘭編織; 籃網紋; 麻花編織; 費爾島圖紋; 漁夫編織; 嵌花; 點狀鏤空; 羅紋編織; 桂花針; 鬆餅格編織; 其他
nl: Brei stijl: Aran; Mandweefsel; Kabelgebreid; Fair Isle; Vissersgebreid; Intarsia; Pointelle; Ribgebreid; Gerstekorrel; Wafelgebreid; Anders
sl-SI: Slog pletenja: Aran; Vzorec košarice; Kitke; Fair Isle; Ribiško pletenje; Intarzija; Pointelle; Rebrasto pletenje; Rižev vzorec; Vafljasto pletenje; Drugo
vi: Kiểu đan: Aran; Đan rổ; Đan vặn thừng; Fair Isle; Đan kiểu Fisherman; Intarsia; Pointelle; Đan gân; Mũi đan hạt giống; Đan kiểu tổ ong; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl úpletu: Aran; Košíkový vzor; Osmičkový vzor; Fair Isle; Rybársky vzor; Intarzia; Pointelle; Rebrovaný úplet; Perličkový vzor; Vafľový vzor; Iné
fi: Neuleen tyyli: Aran; Koripunos; Palmikkoneule; Fair Isle; Kalastajaneule; Intarsia; Reikäkuvio; Joustinneule; Helmineule; Vohvelineule; Muu
en: Knit style: Aran; Basket weave; Cable knit; Fair Isle; Fisherman knit; Intarsia; Pointelle; Rib knit; Seed stitch; Waffle knit; Other
pt-BR: Estilo de tricô: Aran; Trama de cesta; Tricô de tranças; Fair Isle; Tricô de pescador; Intarsia; Pointelle; Tricô canelado; Ponto arroz; Tricô waffle; Outro
ru: Стиль вязки: Аранская вязка; Плетенка; Вязка косами; Фэр-Айл; Английская резинка; Интарсия; Пуантель; Вязка в рубчик; Жемчужная вязка; Вафельная вязка; Другое
nb: Strikkestil: Aran; Kurvflett; Flettestrikk; Fair Isle; Fiskerstrikk; Intarsia; Pointelle; Ribbestrikk; Perlestrikk; Vaffelstrikk; Annet
pt-PT: Estilo da malha: Aran; Trama de cesto; Malha de trança; Fair Isle; Malha de pescador; Intársia; Pointelle; Malha canelada; Ponto de semente; Malha waffle; Outro
ko: 니트 스타일: 아란; 바스켓 위브; 케이블 니트; 페어 아일; 피셔맨 니트; 인타르시아; 포인트엘; 리브 니트; 시드 스티치; 와플 니트; 기타
tr: Örgü stili: Aran; Sepet örgü; Saç örgü; Fair Isle; Balıkçı örgüsü; İntarsia; Ajur; Fitilli örgü; Pirinç örgü; Petek örgü; Diğer
de: Strickstil: Aran; Korbgeflecht; Zopfstrick; Fair Isle; Fischerstrick; Intarsien; Pointelle; Rippstrick; Perlmuster; Waffelstrick; Sonstige
lt-LT: Mezginio stilius: Arano stilius; Krepšelio pynimas; Pynių mezgimas; Fair Isle stilius; Žvejo mezgimas; Intarsija; Kiauraraštis; Stulpelinis mezgimas; Perlinis raštas; Vaflių rašto mezgimas; Kita
cs: Pletený styl: Aran; Košíkový vzor; Copánkový úplet; Fair Isle; Rybářský úplet; Intarzie; Pointelle; Žebrovaný úplet; Perličkový vzor; Vaflový úplet; Jiné
es: Tipo de punto: Aran; Tejido de cestería; Punto de ochos; Fair Isle; Punto de pescador; Intarsia; Pointelle; Punto acanalado; Punto de arroz; Punto waffle; Otro
hr-HR: Pleteni stil: Aran; Košara vez; Pletenica vez; Fair Isle; Ribarsko pletivo; Intarzija; Pointelle; Rebrasto pletivo; Rižin bod; Waffle pletivo; Ostalo